Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
REMEDIES, VIOLATIONS, COMPACTS, CONSTRUCTION

§157-41 Remedies; penalties. (a) The
board of agriculture may institute such action as may be necessary to enforce
compliance with this chapter.

(b) Any person who violates this chapter shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not less than $250 or more
than $1,000 or imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

(c) The board of agriculture, after notice and
opportunity for hearing, may fine any person who violates this chapter or any
rule adopted under this chapter, not less than $250 or more than $1,000 for
each separate offense. Each day or instance of violation shall constitute a
separate offense. Any action taken to impose or collect the penalty provided
for in this subsection shall be considered a civil action.

(d) Lawful compliance with this chapter shall
not be deemed a violation of chapter 480. [L 1967, c 260, §25; HRS §157-41; am
L 1989, c 115, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next